Utah statutes.
78A-6-205.   District court executives -- Selection -- Duties.
(1)  The chief administrative officer of the juvenile court, with the approval
of the judge of each district or the presiding judge of multiple judge
districts, shall appoint a court executive for each district.  The court
executive serves at the pleasure of the chief administrative officer.
(2)  The court executive shall:
(a)  appoint a clerk of the court, deputy court clerks, probation officers,
and other persons as required to carry out the work of the court;
(b)  supervise the work of all nonjudicial court staff of the district; and
(c)  serve as administrative officer of the district.
(3)  The clerk shall keep a record of court proceedings and may issue all
process and notice required.
